resources/dicts/fr-classique+reforme1990.aff
FLAG long
SFX d5 Y 152
SFX d5 er er/125 er 64
SFX d5 er ant/125 er 48
SFX d5 eter ette/27 jeter 34
SFX d5 eter ette/27 [^j]eter 34
SFX d5 eter ète/27 [^j]eter 34
SFX d5 eler elle/27 ppeler 34
SFX d5 eler elle/27 [^p].eler 34
SFX d5 eler èle/27 [^p].eler 34
SFX d5 eter ettes/25 jeter 35
SFX d5 eter ettes/25 [^j]eter 35
SFX d5 eter ètes/25 [^j]eter 35
SFX d5 eler elles/25 ppeler 35
SFX d5 eler elles/25 [^p].eler 35
SFX d5 eler èles/25 [^p].eler 35
SFX d5 eter ette/18 jeter 21
SFX d5 eter ette/18 [^j]eter 21
SFX d5 eter ète/18 [^j]eter 21
SFX d5 eler elle/18 ppeler 21
SFX d5 eler elle/18 [^p].eler 21
SFX d5 eler èle/18 [^p].eler 21
SFX d5 er ons/35 er 56
SFX d5 er ez/32 er 72
SFX d5 eter ettent/18 jeter 26
SFX d5 eter ettent/18 [^j]eter 26
SFX d5 eter ètent/18 [^j]eter 26
SFX d5 eler ellent/18 ppeler 26
SFX d5 eler ellent/18 [^p].eler 26
SFX d5 eler èlent/18 [^p].eler 26
SFX d5 er ais/27 er 66
SFX d5 er ais/25 er 65
SFX d5 er ait/18 er 50
SFX d5 er ions/35 er 77
SFX d5 er iez/32 er 76
SFX d5 er aient/18 er 51
SFX d5 er ai/27 er 69
SFX d5 er as/25 er 68
SFX d5 er a/18 er 53
SFX d5 er âmes/35 er 63
SFX d5 er âtes/32 er 62
SFX d5 er èrent/18 er 71
SFX d5 eter etterai/27 jeter 38
SFX d5 eter etterai/27 [^j]eter 38
SFX d5 eter èterai/27 [^j]eter 38
SFX d5 eler ellerai/27 ppeler 38
SFX d5 eler ellerai/27 [^p].eler 38
SFX d5 eler èlerai/27 [^p].eler 38
SFX d5 eter etteras/25 jeter 37
SFX d5 eter etteras/25 [^j]eter 37
SFX d5 eter èteras/25 [^j]eter 37
SFX d5 eler elleras/25 ppeler 37
SFX d5 eler elleras/25 [^p].eler 37
SFX d5 eler èleras/25 [^p].eler 37
SFX d5 eter ettera/18 jeter 22
SFX d5 eter ettera/18 [^j]eter 22
SFX d5 eter ètera/18 [^j]eter 22
SFX d5 eler ellera/18 ppeler 22
SFX d5 eler ellera/18 [^p].eler 22
SFX d5 eler èlera/18 [^p].eler 22
SFX d5 eter etterons/35 jeter 31
SFX d5 eter etterons/35 [^j]eter 31
SFX d5 eter èterons/35 [^j]eter 31
SFX d5 eler ellerons/35 ppeler 31
SFX d5 eler ellerons/35 [^p].eler 31
SFX d5 eler èlerons/35 [^p].eler 31
SFX d5 eter etterez/32 jeter 30
SFX d5 eter etterez/32 [^j]eter 30
SFX d5 eter èterez/32 [^j]eter 30
SFX d5 eler ellerez/32 ppeler 30
SFX d5 eler ellerez/32 [^p].eler 30
SFX d5 eler èlerez/32 [^p].eler 30
SFX d5 eter etteront/18 jeter 24
SFX d5 eter etteront/18 [^j]eter 24
SFX d5 eter èteront/18 [^j]eter 24
SFX d5 eler elleront/18 ppeler 24
SFX d5 eler elleront/18 [^p].eler 24
SFX d5 eler èleront/18 [^p].eler 24
SFX d5 eter etterais/27 jeter 40
SFX d5 eter etterais/27 [^j]eter 40
SFX d5 eter èterais/27 [^j]eter 40
SFX d5 eler ellerais/27 ppeler 40
SFX d5 eler ellerais/27 [^p].eler 40
SFX d5 eler èlerais/27 [^p].eler 40
SFX d5 eter etterais/25 jeter 39
SFX d5 eter etterais/25 [^j]eter 39
SFX d5 eter èterais/25 [^j]eter 39
SFX d5 eler ellerais/25 ppeler 39
SFX d5 eler ellerais/25 [^p].eler 39
SFX d5 eler èlerais/25 [^p].eler 39
SFX d5 eter etterait/18 jeter 23
SFX d5 eter etterait/18 [^j]eter 23
SFX d5 eter èterait/18 [^j]eter 23
SFX d5 eler ellerait/18 ppeler 23
SFX d5 eler ellerait/18 [^p].eler 23
SFX d5 eler èlerait/18 [^p].eler 23
SFX d5 eter etterions/35 jeter 33
SFX d5 eter etterions/35 [^j]eter 33
SFX d5 eter èterions/35 [^j]eter 33
SFX d5 eler ellerions/35 ppeler 33
SFX d5 eler ellerions/35 [^p].eler 33
SFX d5 eler èlerions/35 [^p].eler 33
SFX d5 eter etteriez/32 jeter 32
SFX d5 eter etteriez/32 [^j]eter 32
SFX d5 eter èteriez/32 [^j]eter 32
SFX d5 eler elleriez/32 ppeler 32
SFX d5 eler elleriez/32 [^p].eler 32
SFX d5 eler èleriez/32 [^p].eler 32
SFX d5 eter etteraient/18 jeter 25
SFX d5 eter etteraient/18 [^j]eter 25
SFX d5 eter èteraient/18 [^j]eter 25
SFX d5 eler elleraient/18 ppeler 25
SFX d5 eler elleraient/18 [^p].eler 25
SFX d5 eler èleraient/18 [^p].eler 25
SFX d5 eter ette/27 jeter 41
SFX d5 eter ette/27 [^j]eter 41
SFX d5 eter ète/27 [^j]eter 41
SFX d5 eler elle/27 ppeler 41
SFX d5 eler elle/27 [^p].eler 41
SFX d5 eler èle/27 [^p].eler 41
SFX d5 eter ettes/25 jeter 44
SFX d5 eter ettes/25 [^j]eter 44
SFX d5 eter ètes/25 [^j]eter 44
SFX d5 eler elles/25 ppeler 44
SFX d5 eler elles/25 [^p].eler 44
SFX d5 eler èles/25 [^p].eler 44
SFX d5 eter ette/18 jeter 27
SFX d5 eter ette/18 [^j]eter 27
SFX d5 eter ète/18 [^j]eter 27
SFX d5 eler elle/18 ppeler 27
SFX d5 eler elle/18 [^p].eler 27
SFX d5 eler èle/18 [^p].eler 27
SFX d5 er ions/35 er 74
SFX d5 er iez/32 er 73
SFX d5 eter ettent/18 jeter 28
SFX d5 eter ettent/18 [^j]eter 28
SFX d5 eter ètent/18 [^j]eter 28
SFX d5 eler ellent/18 ppeler 28
SFX d5 eler ellent/18 [^p].eler 28
SFX d5 eler èlent/18 [^p].eler 28
SFX d5 er asse/27 er 61
SFX d5 er asses/25 er 67
SFX d5 er ât/18 er 52
SFX d5 er assions/35 er 60
SFX d5 er assiez/32 er 59
SFX d5 er assent/18 er 54
SFX d5 eter ette/24 jeter 36
SFX d5 eter ette/24 [^j]eter 36
SFX d5 eter ète/24 [^j]eter 36
SFX d5 eler elle/24 ppeler 36
SFX d5 eler elle/24 [^p].eler 36
SFX d5 eler èle/24 [^p].eler 36
SFX d5 er ons er 58
SFX d5 er ez er 75

SFX aA Y 57
SFX aA ller ller/157 aller 64
SFX aA ller llant/62 aller 48
SFX aA ller llé/28 aller 85
SFX aA ller llés/28 aller 86
SFX aA ller llée/28 aller 80
SFX aA ller llées/28 aller 81
SFX aA aller vais aller 34
SFX aA aller vas aller 35
SFX aA aller va aller 21
SFX aA ller llons/16 aller 56
SFX aA ller llez/16 aller 72
SFX aA aller vont aller 26
SFX aA ller llais/98 aller 66
SFX aA ller llais/16 aller 65
SFX aA ller llait/62 aller 50
SFX aA ller llions/16 aller 77
SFX aA ller lliez/16 aller 76
SFX aA ller llaient/62 aller 51
SFX aA ller llai/98 aller 69
SFX aA ller llas/16 aller 68
SFX aA ller lla/62 aller 53
SFX aA ller llâmes/16 aller 63
SFX aA ller llâtes/16 aller 62
SFX aA ller llèrent/62 aller 71
SFX aA aller irai/98 aller 38
SFX aA aller iras/16 aller 37
SFX aA aller ira/62 aller 22
SFX aA aller irons/16 aller 31
SFX aA aller irez/62 aller 30
SFX aA aller iront/16 aller 24
SFX aA aller irais/98 aller 40
SFX aA aller irais/16 aller 39
SFX aA aller irait/62 aller 23
SFX aA aller irions/16 aller 33
SFX aA aller iriez/16 aller 32
SFX aA aller iraient/62 aller 25
SFX aA ller ille/26 aller 41
SFX aA ller illes/13 aller 44
SFX aA ller ille/62 aller 27
SFX aA ller llions/13 aller 74
SFX aA ller lliez/13 aller 73
SFX aA ller illent/62 aller 28
SFX aA ller llasse/98 aller 61
SFX aA ller llasses/16 aller 67
SFX aA ller llât/62 aller 52
SFX aA ller llassions/16 aller 60
SFX aA ller llassiez/16 aller 59
SFX aA ller llassent/62 aller 54
SFX aA ller llons/13 aller 58
SFX aA aller va aller 36
SFX aA aller vas-y aller 314
SFX aA aller va-t'en aller 315
SFX aA ller llons-y aller 318
SFX aA ller llons-nous-en aller 319
SFX aA ller llez/13 aller 75
SFX aA ller llez-y aller 316
SFX aA ller llez-vous-en aller 317

SFX aD Y 51
SFX aD voyer voyer/53 envoyer 64
SFX aD voyer voyant/6 envoyer 48
SFX aD voyer voyé/28 envoyer 85
SFX aD voyer voyés/28 envoyer 86
SFX aD voyer voyée/28 envoyer 80
SFX aD voyer voyées/28 envoyer 81
SFX aD voyer voie/23 envoyer 34
SFX aD voyer voies/20 envoyer 35
SFX aD voyer voie/6 envoyer 21
SFX aD voyer voyons/17 envoyer 56
SFX aD voyer voyez/14 envoyer 72
SFX aD voyer voient/6 envoyer 26
SFX aD voyer voyais/23 envoyer 66
SFX aD voyer voyais/20 envoyer 65
SFX aD voyer voyait/6 envoyer 50
SFX aD voyer voyions/17 envoyer 77
SFX aD voyer voyiez/14 envoyer 76
SFX aD voyer voyaient/6 envoyer 51
SFX aD voyer voyai/23 envoyer 69
SFX aD voyer voyas/20 envoyer 68
SFX aD voyer voya/6 envoyer 53
SFX aD voyer voyâmes/17 envoyer 63
SFX aD voyer voyâtes/14 envoyer 62
SFX aD voyer voyèrent/6 envoyer 71
SFX aD voyer verrai/23 envoyer 38
SFX aD voyer verras/20 envoyer 37
SFX aD voyer verra/6 envoyer 22
SFX aD voyer verrons/17 envoyer 31
SFX aD voyer verrez/14 envoyer 30
SFX aD voyer verront/6 envoyer 24
SFX aD voyer verrais/23 envoyer 40
SFX aD voyer verrais/20 envoyer 39
SFX aD voyer verrait/6 envoyer 23
SFX aD voyer verrions/17 envoyer 33
SFX aD voyer verriez/14 envoyer 32
SFX aD voyer verraient/6 envoyer 25
SFX aD voyer voie/44 envoyer 41
SFX aD voyer voies/36 envoyer 44
SFX aD voyer voie/6 envoyer 27
SFX aD voyer voyions/56 envoyer 74
SFX aD voyer voyiez/31 envoyer 73
SFX aD voyer voient/6 envoyer 28
SFX aD voyer voyasse/23 envoyer 61
SFX aD voyer voyasses/20 envoyer 67
SFX aD voyer voyât/6 envoyer 52
SFX aD voyer voyassions/17 envoyer 60
SFX aD voyer voyassiez/14 envoyer 59
SFX aD voyer voyassent/6 envoyer 54
SFX aD voyer voie/36 envoyer 36
SFX aD voyer voyons/45 envoyer 58
SFX aD voyer voyez/31 envoyer 75

SFX aE Y 6
SFX aE direr direr/53 direr 64
SFX aE direr dirant/6 direr 48
SFX aE direr diré/28 direr 85
SFX aE direr dirés/28 direr 86
SFX aE direr dirée/28 direr 80
SFX aE direr dirées/28 direr 81

SFX aF N 16
SFX aF cerner cerner er 64
SFX aF cerner cernant er 48
SFX aF cerner cerné er 85
SFX aF cerner cernés er 86
SFX aF cerner cernée er 80
SFX aF cerner cernées er 81
SFX aF cerner cerne er 21
SFX aF cerner cernent er 26
SFX aF cerner cernait er 50
SFX aF cerner cernaient er 51
SFX aF cerner cerna er 53
SFX aF cerner cernèrent er 71
SFX aF cerner cernera er 22
SFX aF cerner cerneront er 24
SFX aF cerner cernerait er 23
SFX aF cerner cerneraient er 25

SFX aG Y 19
SFX aG er er/157 er 64
SFX aG er ant/62 er 48
SFX aG mber mbé mber 106
SFX aG lter lté lter 85
SFX aG lter ltés lter 86
SFX aG lter ltée lter 80
SFX aG lter ltées lter 81
SFX aG er e/62 er 21
SFX aG er ent/62 er 26
SFX aG er ait/62 er 50
SFX aG er aient/62 er 51
SFX aG er a/62 er 53
SFX aG er èrent/62 er 71
SFX aG er ât/62 er 52
SFX aG er assent/62 er 54
SFX aG er era/62 er 22
SFX aG er eront/62 er 24
SFX aG er erait/62 er 23
SFX aG er eraient/62 er 25

SFX aH N 48
SFX aH er er gger 64
SFX aH er ant gger 48
SFX aH er é gger 85
SFX aH er e gger 34
SFX aH er es gger 35
SFX aH er e gger 21
SFX aH er ons gger 56
SFX aH er ez gger 72
SFX aH er ent gger 26
SFX aH er ais gger 66
SFX aH er ais gger 65
SFX aH er ait gger 50
SFX aH er ions gger 77
SFX aH er iez gger 76
SFX aH er aient gger 51
SFX aH er ai gger 69
SFX aH er as gger 68
SFX aH er a gger 53
SFX aH er âmes gger 63
SFX aH er âtes gger 62
SFX aH er èrent gger 71
SFX aH er erai gger 38
SFX aH er eras gger 37
SFX aH er era gger 22
SFX aH er erons gger 31
SFX aH er erez gger 30
SFX aH er eront gger 24
SFX aH er erais gger 40
SFX aH er erais gger 39
SFX aH er erait gger 23
SFX aH er erions gger 33
SFX aH er eriez gger 32
SFX aH er eraient gger 25
SFX aH er e gger 41
SFX aH er es gger 44
SFX aH er e gger 27
SFX aH er ions gger 74
SFX aH er iez gger 73
SFX aH er ent gger 28
SFX aH er asse gger 61
SFX aH er asses gger 67
SFX aH er ât gger 52
SFX aH er assions gger 60
SFX aH er assiez gger 59
SFX aH er assent gger 54
SFX aH er e gger 36
SFX aH er ons gger 58
SFX aH er ez gger 75
